Colorado statutes. TITLE 42 VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC
PART 11
SPEED REGULATIONS

Cross references:

For the penalties for class 2 misdemeanor traffic offenses and class A traffic infractions, see § 42-4-1701 (3).

42-4-1101. Speed limits.

No person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed greater than is reasonable and prudent under the conditions then existing.

Except when a special hazard exists that requires a lower speed, the following speeds shall be lawful:

Twenty miles per hour on narrow, winding mountain highways or on blind curves;

Twenty-five miles per hour in any business district, as defined in section 42-1-102 (11);

Thirty miles per hour in any residence district, as defined in section 42-1-102 (80);

Forty miles per hour on open mountain highways;

Forty-five miles per hour for all single rear axle vehicles in the business of transporting trash that exceed twenty thousand pounds, where higher speeds are posted, when said vehicle is loaded as an exempted vehicle pursuant to section 42-4-507 (3);

Fifty-five miles per hour on other open highways which are not on the interstate system, as defined in section 43-2-101 (2), C.R.S., and are not surfaced, four-lane freeways or expressways;

Sixty-five miles per hour on surfaced, four-lane highways which are on the interstate system, as defined in section 43-2-101 (2), C.R.S., or are freeways or expressways;

Any speed not in excess of a speed limit designated by an official traffic control device.

No driver of a vehicle shall fail to decrease the speed of such vehicle from an otherwise lawful speed to a reasonable and prudent speed when a special hazard exists with respect to pedestrians or other traffic or by reason of weather or highway conditions.

Except as otherwise provided in paragraph (c) of subsection (8) of this section, any speed in excess of the lawful speeds set forth in subsection (2) of this section shall be prima facie evidence that such speed was not reasonable or prudent under the conditions then existing. As used in this subsection (4), "prima facie evidence" means evidence which is sufficient proof that the speed was not reasonable or prudent under the conditions then existing, and which will remain sufficient proof of such fact, unless contradicted and overcome by evidence bearing upon the question of whether or not the speed was reasonable and prudent under the conditions then existing.

In every charge of violating subsection (1) of this section, the complaint, summons and complaint, or penalty assessment notice shall specify the speed at which the defendant is alleged to have driven and also the alleged reasonable and prudent speed applicable at the specified time and location of the alleged violation.

The provisions of this section shall not be construed to relieve the party alleging negligence under this section in any civil action for damages from the burden of proving that such negligence was the proximate cause of an accident.

Notwithstanding paragraphs (a), (b), and (c) of subsection (2) of this section, any city or town may by ordinance adopt absolute speed limits as the maximum lawful speed limits in its jurisdiction, and such speed limits shall not be subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

(Deleted by amendment,

L. 96, p. 578

, § 2, effective May 25, 1996.)

Notwithstanding any other provisions of this section, no person shall drive a vehicle on a highway at a speed in excess of a maximum lawful speed limit of seventy-five miles per hour.

The speed limit set forth in paragraph (b) of this subsection (8) is the maximum lawful speed limit and is not subject to the provisions of subsection (4) of this section.

State and local authorities within their respective jurisdictions shall not authorize any speed limit which exceeds seventy-five miles per hour on any highway.

The provisions of this subsection (8) are declared to be matters of both local and statewide concern requiring uniform compliance throughout the state.

In every charge of a violation of paragraph (b) of this subsection (8), the complaint, summons and complaint, or penalty assessment notice shall specify the speed at which the defendant is alleged to have driven and also the maximum lawful speed limit of seventy-five miles per hour.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, no person shall drive a low-power scooter on a roadway at a speed in excess of forty miles per hour. State and local authorities shall not authorize low-power scooters to exceed forty miles per hour on a roadway.

The conduct of a driver of a vehicle which would otherwise constitute a violation of this section is justifiable and not unlawful when:

It is necessary as an emergency measure to avoid an imminent public or private injury which is about to occur by reason of a situation occasioned or developed through no conduct of said driver and which is of sufficient gravity that, according to ordinary standards of intelligence and morality, the desirability and urgency of avoiding the injury clearly outweigh the desirability of avoiding the consequences sought to be prevented by this section; or

With respect to authorized emergency vehicles, the applicable conditions for exemption, as set forth in section 42-4-108, exist.

The minimum requirement for commission of a traffic infraction or misdemeanor traffic offense under this section is the performance by a driver of prohibited conduct, which includes a voluntary act or the omission to perform an act which said driver is physically capable of performing.

It shall not be a defense to prosecution for a violation of this section that:

The defendant's conduct was not performed intentionally, knowingly, recklessly, or with criminal negligence; or

The defendant's conduct was performed under a mistaken belief of fact, including, but not limited to, a mistaken belief of the defendant regarding the speed of the defendant's vehicle; or

The defendant's vehicle has a greater operating or fuel-conserving efficiency at speeds greater than the reasonable and prudent speed under the conditions then existing or at speeds greater than the maximum lawful speed limit.

A violation of driving one to twenty-four miles per hour in excess of the reasonable and prudent speed or in excess of the maximum lawful speed limit of seventy-five miles per hour is a class A traffic infraction.

A violation of driving twenty-five or more miles per hour in excess of the reasonable and prudent speed or in excess of the maximum lawful speed limit of seventy-five miles per hour is a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense; except that such violation within a maintenance, repair, or construction zone, designated pursuant to section 42-4-614, is a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense.

A violation under subsection (3) of this section is a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2363, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 96:

(2)(f), (2)(g), (8)(a), (8)(b), (8)(c), (8)(d), (8)(f), and (12) amended, p. 578, § 2, effective May 25.

L. 2003:

(2)(e) amended, p. 717, § 1, effective August 6.

L. 2008:

(12) amended, p. 2082, § 7, effective June 3.

L. 2009:

(8)(g) added, (HB 09-1026), ch. 281, p. 1277, § 54, effective October 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1001 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1101 was relocated to § 42-4-1201.

Cross references:

Section 1 of chapter 412, Session Laws of Colorado 2008, provides that the act amending subsection (12) shall be known and may be cited as the "Charles Mather Highway Safety Act".

42-4-1102. Altering of speed limits - department to study rural state highways and increase speed limits - definitions - repeal.

Whenever the department of transportation determines upon the basis of a traffic investigation or survey or upon the basis of appropriate design standards and projected traffic volumes in the case of newly constructed highways or segments thereof that any speed specified or established as authorized under sections 42-4-1101 to 42-4-1104 is greater or less than is reasonable or safe under the road and traffic conditions at any intersection or other place or upon any part of a state highway under its jurisdiction, said department shall determine and declare a reasonable and safe speed limit thereat which shall be effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected at such intersection or other place or upon the approaches thereto; except that no speed limit in excess of seventy-five miles per hour shall be authorized by said department.

Repealed.

Whenever county or municipal authorities, within their respective jurisdictions, determine upon the basis of a traffic investigation or survey and, for residential neighborhoods, after additional optional consideration of road characteristics, current and future development, environmental factors, parking practices, pedestrian and bicycle activity in the vicinity, and crash statistics from the most recent year, or upon the basis of appropriate design standards and projected traffic volumes in the case of newly constructed highways or segments thereof, that any speed specified or established as authorized under sections 42-4-1101 to 42-4-1104 is greater or less than is reasonable or safe under the road and traffic conditions at an intersection or other place or upon any part of a street or highway in its jurisdiction, the local authority shall determine and declare a reasonable and safe speed limit that is effective when appropriate signs giving notice thereof are erected at the intersection or other place or upon the approaches thereto. A local authority shall not alter the basic rules set forth in section 42-4-1101 (1) or authorize by resolution or ordinance a speed in excess of seventy-five miles per hour.

Local municipal authorities within their respective jurisdictions shall determine upon the basis of a traffic investigation or survey the proper speed for all arterial streets and shall declare a reasonable and safe speed limit thereon which may be greater or less than the speed specified under section 42-4-1101 (2)(b) or (2)(c). Such speed limit shall not exceed seventy-five miles per hour and shall become effective when appropriate signs are erected giving notice thereof. For purposes of this subsection (3), an "arterial street" means any United States or state-numbered route, controlled-access highway, or other major radial or circumferential street or highway designated by local authorities within their respective jurisdictions as part of a major arterial system of streets or highways.

(3.5) (a) The department of transportation, referred to in this subsection (3.5) as the "department", shall study relevant and appropriate state highways in rural areas of the state for the purpose of identifying portions of rural state highways where the speed limit can be raised as described in section 42-4-1101 without endangering public safety. In identifying these portions of rural state highways, the department shall consider:

Whether the portion of highway is predominantly straight;

The quality of the surface of the portion of highway, including whether the portion of highway has been resurfaced recently;

The presence or absence of adequate space along both sides of the portion of highway to allow a vehicle to safely pull over to the side of the highway;

The safety of vulnerable road users who use the portion of highway; and

Any other safety concerns that the department, in its discretion, includes in the report.

In identifying portions of rural state highways where the speed limit can be raised pursuant to subsection (3.5)(a) of this section, the department shall give preference to portions of rural state highways that:

Connect rural towns to one or more cities;

Provide access to one or more public or private schools; and

Are relatively heavily traveled.

On or before March 1, 2021, the department shall complete the study described in subsection (3.5)(a) of this section. The department shall include a summary of the study in the department's next annual report to the legislative committees of reference pursuant to section 2-7-203. The summary must indicate the conclusions of the study and the portions of rural highways for which the department will increase the speed limit.

As used in this subsection (3.5), unless the context otherwise requires, "vulnerable road user" means:

A pedestrian;

A person engaged in work upon a roadway or upon utility facilities along a roadway;

A person providing emergency services within a right-of-way;

A peace officer who is outside a motor vehicle and performing the peace officer's duties in a right-of-way;

A person riding or leading an animal; or

A person lawfully using any of the following on a public right-of-way, crosswalk, or shoulder of the roadway:

A bicycle, electrical assisted bicycle, tricycle, or other pedal-powered vehicle;

A farm tractor or similar vehicle designed primarily for farm use;

A skateboard;

Roller skates;

In-line skates;

A scooter;

A moped;

A motorcycle;

An off-highway vehicle;

An animal-drawn, wheeled vehicle;

Farm equipment;

A sled;

An electric personal assistive mobility device;

A wheelchair;

A baby stroller; or

A nonmotorized pull wagon.

This subsection (3.5) is repealed, effective July 1, 2022.

No alteration of speed limits on state highways within cities, cities and counties, and incorporated towns is effective until it has been approved in writing by the department of transportation. Upon the request of any incorporated city or town, the department of transportation shall conduct any traffic investigation or survey that is deemed to be warranted for determination of a safe and reasonable speed limit on any street or portion thereof that is a state highway. In conducting such a traffic investigation, the department may receive and consider traffic and engineering data provided by the city or county engineer of any requesting local government that will be impacted by a proposed alteration of speed limits. Any speed limit so determined by the department becomes effective when declared by the local authority and made known by official signs conforming to the state traffic control manual.

Whenever the department of transportation or local authorities, within their respective jurisdictions, determine upon the basis of a traffic investigation or survey that a reduced speed limit is warranted in a school or construction area or other place during certain hours or periods of the day when special or temporary hazards exist, the department or the concerned local authority may erect or display official signs of a type prescribed in the state traffic control manual giving notice of the appropriate speed limit for such conditions and stating the time or period the regulation is effective. When such signs are erected or displayed, the lawful speed limit at the particular time and place shall be that which is then indicated upon such signs; except that no such speed limit shall be less than twenty miles per hour on a state highway or other arterial street as defined in subsection (3) of this section nor less than fifteen miles per hour on any other road or street, nor shall any such reduced speed limit be made applicable at times when the special conditions for which it is imposed cease to exist. Such reduced speed limits on streets which are state highways shall be subject to the written approval of the department of transportation before becoming effective.

In its discretion, a municipality, by ordinance, or a county, by resolution of the board of county commissioners, may impose and enforce stop sign regulations and speed limits, not inconsistent with the provisions of sections 42-4-1101 to 42-4-1104, upon any way which is open to travel by motor vehicles and which is privately maintained in mobile home parks, when appropriate signs giving notice of such enforcement are erected at the entrances to such ways. Unless there is an agreement to the contrary, the jurisdiction ordering the regulations shall be responsible for the erection and maintenance of the signs.

Any powers granted in this section to county or municipal authorities may be exercised by such authorities or by any municipal officer or employee who is designated by ordinance to exercise such powers.

The department of transportation shall not set a speed limit on interstate 70 for commercial vehicles or any other motor vehicle that differs from the highest authorized speed for any other type of motor vehicle on the same portion of a highway by more than twenty-five miles per hour.

For purposes of this section, "residential neighborhood" has the same meaning as set forth in section 42-4-110.5 (2)(g)(II).

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2366, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 95:

(3) amended, p. 956, § 16, effective May 25.

L. 96:

(1), (2), and (3) amended, p. 579, § 3, effective May 25.

L. 2010:

(8) added, (SB 10-196), ch. 333, p. 1534, § 1, effective July 1.

L. 2014:

(4) amended, (SB 14-146), ch. 141, p. 486, § 1, effective May 2.

L. 2018:

(2) amended and (9) added, (HB 18-1191), ch. 156, p. 1098, § 1, effective August 8.

L. 2020:

(3.5) added, (HB 20-1178), ch. 90, p. 361, § 1, effective September 14.

42-4-1103. Minimum speed regulation.

No person shall drive a motor vehicle on any highway at such a slow speed as to impede or block the normal and reasonable forward movement of traffic, except when a reduced speed is necessary for safe operation of such vehicle or in compliance with law.

Whenever the department of transportation or local authorities within their respective jurisdictions determine, on the basis of an engineering and traffic investigation as described in the state traffic control manual, that slow speeds on any part of a highway consistently impede the normal and reasonable movement of traffic, said department or such local authority may determine and declare a minimum speed limit below which no person shall drive a vehicle, except when necessary for safe operation or in compliance with law.

Notwithstanding any minimum speed that may be authorized and posted pursuant to this section, if any person drives a motor vehicle on a highway outside an incorporated area or on any controlled-access highway at a speed less than the normal and reasonable speed of traffic under the conditions then and there existing and by so driving at such slower speed impedes or retards the normal and reasonable movement of vehicular traffic following immediately behind, then such driver shall:

Where the width of the traveled way permits, drive in the right-hand lane available to traffic or on the extreme right side of the roadway consistent with the provisions of section 42-4-1001 (2) until such impeded traffic has passed by; or

Pull off the roadway at the first available place where such movement can safely and lawfully be made until such impeded traffic has passed by.

Wherever special uphill traffic lanes or roadside turnouts are provided and posted, drivers of all vehicles proceeding at less than the normal and reasonable speed of traffic shall use such lanes or turnouts to allow other vehicles to pass or maintain normal traffic flow.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2368, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1003 as it existed prior to 1994.

42-4-1104. Speed limits on elevated structures.

No person shall drive a vehicle over any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway at a speed which is greater than the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to such bridge or structure, when such structure is signposted as provided in this section.

The department of transportation upon request from any local authority shall, or upon its own initiative may, conduct an investigation of any bridge or other elevated structure constituting a part of a highway, and, if it finds that such structure cannot with safety to itself withstand vehicles traveling at the speed otherwise permissible under sections 42-4-1101 to 42-4-1104, said department shall determine and declare the maximum speed of vehicles which such structure can withstand and shall cause or permit suitable standard signs stating such maximum speed to be erected and maintained before each end of such structure in conformity with the state traffic control manual.

Upon the trial of any person charged with a violation of this section, proof of said determination of the maximum speed by said department and the existence of said signs shall constitute conclusive evidence of the maximum speed which can be maintained with safety to such bridge or structure.

Any person who violates any provision of this section commits a class A traffic infraction.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2368, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1004 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1104 was relocated to § 42-4-1204.

42-4-1105. Speed contests - speed exhibitions - aiding and facilitating - immobilization of motor vehicle - definitions.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is unlawful for a person to knowingly engage in a speed contest on a highway.

For purposes of this section, "speed contest" means the operation of one or more motor vehicles to conduct a race or a time trial, including but not limited to rapid acceleration, exceeding reasonable and prudent speeds for highways and existing traffic conditions, vying for position, or performing one or more lane changes in an attempt to gain advantage over one or more of the other race participants.

A person who violates any provision of this subsection (1) commits a class 1 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, it is unlawful for a person to knowingly engage in a speed exhibition on a highway.

For purposes of this section, "speed exhibition" means the operation of a motor vehicle to present a display of speed or power. "Speed exhibition" includes, but is not limited to, squealing the tires of a motor vehicle while it is stationary or in motion, rapid acceleration, rapid swerving or weaving in and out of traffic, producing smoke from tire slippage, or leaving visible tire acceleration marks on the surface of the highway or ground.

A person who violates any provision of this subsection (2) commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (4) of this section, a person shall not, for the purpose of facilitating or aiding or as an incident to any speed contest or speed exhibition upon a highway, in any manner obstruct or place a barricade or obstruction, or assist or participate in placing any such barricade or obstruction, upon a highway.

A person who violates any provision of this subsection (3) commits, pursuant to section 42-4-1703, the offense that the person aided in or facilitated the commission of. Nothing in this subsection (3) shall be construed to preclude charging a person under section 42-4-1703 for otherwise being a party to the crime of engaging in a speed contest or engaging in a speed exhibition.

The provisions of this section shall not apply to the operation of a motor vehicle in an organized competition according to accepted rules on a designated and duly authorized race track, race course, or drag strip.

In addition to a sentence imposed pursuant to this section or pursuant to any other provision of law:

Upon the second conviction for an offense specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or any other crime, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court to include an act of operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the court may, in its discretion, order the primary law enforcement agency involved with the case to place an immobilization device on the motor vehicle or motor vehicles so operated for a period of up to fourteen days.

Upon the third or subsequent conviction for an offense specified in subsection (1) or (2) of this section, or any other crime, the underlying factual basis of which has been found by the court to include an act of operating a motor vehicle in violation of subsection (1) or (2) of this section, the court may, in its discretion, order the primary law enforcement agency involved with the case to place an immobilization device on the motor vehicle or motor vehicles so operated for a period of up to thirty days but more than fourteen days.

The period during which a motor vehicle may be fitted with an immobilization device pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (5) shall be in addition to any period during which the motor vehicle was impounded prior to sentencing.

An order issued under this subsection (5) shall state the requirements included in subsections (7) and (8) of this section.

For purposes of this section, "immobilization device" means a device locked into place over a wheel of a motor vehicle that prevents the motor vehicle from being moved. "Immobilization device" includes but is not limited to a device commonly referred to as a "traffic boot" or "boot".

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (9) of this section, a law enforcement agency that is ordered to place an immobilization device on a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall attempt to locate the motor vehicle within its jurisdiction. The law enforcement agency may, in its discretion, attempt to locate the motor vehicle outside of its jurisdiction.

Nothing in this subsection (6) shall be construed to:

Prohibit a law enforcement agency from seeking the assistance of another law enforcement agency for the purpose of placing an immobilization device on a motor vehicle or removing the device in accordance with this section; or

Require a law enforcement agency to expend excessive time or commit excessive staff to the task of locating a motor vehicle subject to immobilization under this section.

The time spent by a law enforcement agency in locating a motor vehicle in accordance with this subsection (6) shall not alter the immobilization period ordered by the court under subsection (5) of this section.

A law enforcement agency that places an immobilization device on a motor vehicle pursuant to this section shall affix a notice to the immobilized motor vehicle stating the information described in subsections (7) and (8) of this section.

A peace officer who locates or attempts to locate a motor vehicle, or who places or removes, or assists with the placement or removal of, an immobilization device in accordance with the provisions of this section shall be immune from civil liability for damages, except for damages arising from willful and wanton conduct.

The owner of a motor vehicle immobilized under this section shall be assessed a fee of thirty-five dollars for each day the motor vehicle is ordered immobilized and, except as otherwise provided in paragraph (d) of this subsection (7), thirty-five dollars for each day up to fourteen days after the immobilization period that the fee for the immobilization period is not paid. The owner shall pay the fee to the law enforcement agency that places the immobilization device on the motor vehicle.

The owner, within fourteen days after the end of the immobilization period ordered by the court, may obtain removal of the immobilization device by the law enforcement agency that placed it by requesting the removal and paying the fee required under paragraph (a) of this subsection (7).

The failure of the owner of the immobilized motor vehicle to request removal of the immobilization device and pay the fee within fourteen days after the end of the immobilization period ordered by the court or within the additional time granted by the court pursuant to paragraph (d) of this subsection (7), whichever is applicable, shall result in the motor vehicle being deemed an "abandoned motor vehicle", as defined in sections 42-4-1802 (1)(d) and 42-4-2102 (1)(d), and subject to the provisions of part 18 or 21 of this article, whichever is applicable. The law enforcement agency entitled to payment of the fee under this subsection (7) shall be eligible to recover the fee if the abandoned motor vehicle is sold, pursuant to section 42-4-1809 (2)(b.5) or 42-4-2108 (2)(a.5).

Upon application of the owner of an immobilized motor vehicle, the court that ordered the immobilization may, in its discretion, grant additional time to pay the immobilization fee required under paragraph (a) of this subsection (7). If additional time is granted, the court shall notify the law enforcement agency that placed the immobilization device.

A person may not remove an immobilization device that is placed on a motor vehicle pursuant to this section during the immobilization period ordered by the court.

No person may remove the immobilization device after the end of the immobilization period except the law enforcement agency that placed the immobilization device and that has been requested by the owner to remove the device and to which the owner has properly paid the fee required by subsection (7) of this section. Nothing in this subsection (8) shall be construed to prevent the removal of an immobilization device in order to comply with the provisions of part 18 or 21 of this article.

A person who violates any provision of this subsection (8) commits a class 2 misdemeanor traffic offense.

A law enforcement agency that is ordered to place an immobilization device on a motor vehicle pursuant to subsection (5) of this section shall inform the court at sentencing if it is unable to comply with the court's order either because the law enforcement agency is not yet equipped with an immobilization device or because it does not have a sufficient number of immobilization devices. The court, upon being so informed, shall, in lieu of ordering immobilization, order the law enforcement agency to impound the motor vehicle for the same time period that the court initially ordered the motor vehicle to be immobilized.

If a motor vehicle is ordered to be impounded pursuant to paragraph (a) of this subsection (9), the provisions of subsections (6) to (8) of this section shall not apply.

Source:

L. 94:

Entire title amended with relocations, p. 2369, § 1, effective January 1, 1995.

L. 2006:

Entire section R&RE, p. 168, § 1, effective July 1.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 42-4-1005 as it existed prior to 1994, and the former § 42-4-1105 was relocated to § 42-4-1205.

Cross references:

For obstructing a highway, see § 18-9-107.

42-4-1106. Minimum speed in left lane - interstate 70.

Where the average grade is six percent or more uphill for at least one mile, no person shall operate a motor vehicle in the far left lane of traffic of interstate 70 at a speed of less than the lower of ten miles per hour below the speed limit or the minimum speed set by the department of transportation, except if:

Necessary to obey traffic control devices;

Necessary to exit or enter interstate 70;

Weather or traffic conditions require speeds slower than the speed limit necessary under section 42-4-1101; or

Necessary because of a lane closure or blockage.

The department of transportation shall post signs giving the public notice of this section.

Source:

L. 2010:

Entire section added, (SB 10-196), ch. 333, p. 1534, § 2, effective July 1.